dictsource/nso_rules
// Northern Sotho translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.group a
        a        a
        _C) a      a
        _) a  (C a
          a (_ a
         a (s  a:

.group b
        b        B


.group c
        c        k
        ch       tS

.group d
        d        d
        dh       D

.group e
        e        e
        ee       i;e:
        s) e  i


.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        X
         _k) g x2

        gh       Q


.group h
        h        h
        hl  l#


.group i
        i        i
        ii       i:

.group j
        j        J

.group k
        k        k
        kh       x

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m
     _) m        m-
        m (A     m
     K) m (@@    _|m
     K) m (C     m-
     K) m (b@@   _|m
     K) m (v@@   _|m
     K) m (w@@   _|m

.group n
        n        n
     _) n        n-
        n (A     n
        n (@@    n
        ny       n^
        n (ch    n^
        n (j     n^
        ng'      N
        n (k     N
     _) n (k     N-
     _) n (k@@   N-
        n (g     N
     _) n (g     N-
     _) n (g@@   N-
          ng N

.group o
        o        U
        oo       o:

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k

.group r
        r          R3

.group s
        s        s
        s (e  s-
        _t) se si:
//        sh       S

.group t
        t        t
        th       th
        tsen ts'e:n
          tlh K
          tl  l#


.group u
        u        u
        uu       u:
        _d) u  u:

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z


.group
        $        dola
        %        asilimia

        *        n^ota
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::

     š  S
     
_t) š tS
     _p) š (h S

           ê E
          ô o
